Missouri, session 2026, HB3488.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 170.048, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 170.048, to read as follows:
170.048. 1. By July 1, 2018, each district shall adopt a policy for youth suicide
awareness and prevention, including plans for how the district will provide for the training
and education of its district employees.
2. (1) Each district's policy shall address and include, but not be limited to, the
following:
[(1)] (a) Strategies that can help identify students who are at possible risk of suicide;
[(2)] (b) Strategies and protocols for helping students at possible risk of suicide; and
[(3)] (c) Protocols for responding to a suicide death.
(2) By July 1, 2027, the district's policy under subdivision (1) of this subsection
shall include protocols for helping students who may be at risk of self-harm.
3. By July 1, 2017, the department of elementary and secondary education shall
develop a model policy that districts may adopt. When developing the model policy, the
department shall cooperate, consult with, and seek input from organizations that have
expertise in youth suicide awareness and prevention. By July 1, 2021, and at least every three
years thereafter, the department shall request information and seek feedback from districts on
their experience with the policy for youth suicide awareness and prevention. The department
shall review this information and may use it to adapt the department's model policy. The
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3488 2
department shall post any information on its website that it has received from districts that it
deems relevant. The department shall not post any confidential information or any
information that personally identifies any student or school employee.
4. (1) Beginning July 1, 2025, a public school or charter school that serves any pupils
in grades seven to twelve and that issues pupil identification cards shall have printed on either
side of the cards:
(a) The three-digit dialing code that directs calls and routes text messages to the
Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, 988; and
(b) The nonemergency telephone number of the local police department; and
(c) May have printed on either side of the cards:
a. The six-digit dialing code that routes text messages to the Crisis Text Line, 741741;
and
b. The telephone number of a local suicide prevention hotline, if such hotline is
available.
(2) If, on July 1, 2025, a public school or charter school subject to the requirements of
this subsection has a supply of unissued pupil identification cards that do not comply with the
requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the school shall issue those cards until that
supply is depleted.
(3) Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall apply to a pupil identification card issued
for the first time to a pupil and to a card issued to replace a damaged or lost card.
5. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, the district's policy under subsection 2 of this
section shall include protocols for teachers, counselors, principals, administrators, or
other school personnel to report to a designated staff member at the school any student
who is at possible risk of suicide or a student who has mentioned self-harm.
(2) The designated staff member, upon any report made under subdivision (1) of
this subsection, shall immediately notify the parent or legal guardian of the student who
is at possible risk of suicide or who has mentioned self-harm, and if necessary, children's
services may be contacted. The designated staff member shall perform a risk
assessment on such student, and the student shall not be released from school until the
parent or legal guardian has received notification under this subdivision.
(3) Notification to the parent or legal guardian shall be repeated until the parent
or legal guardian provides confirmation that he or she is aware that his or her child is at
risk of possible suicide or self-harm.

HB 3488 3
(4) Teachers, counselors, principals, administrators, or other school personnel
shall be immune from civil liability or employment discipline for any action taken under
this subsection.
✔